District of Columbia statutes.
42-1017

Writing needed to execute power.

No power can be executed except by some instrument in writing, which would be sufficient in law to pass the estate or interest intended to pass under the power if the person executing the power were the actual owner.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1354, ch. 854, § 1053

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-117.
1973 Ed., § 45-1017.